California, session 20252026, AB1183.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1941.8 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1941.8. (a) The landlord of a dwelling unit may elect to have an inspection performed, consistent with Section 17970.5 of the Health and Safety Code, to verify that the dwelling unit intended for occupation by human beings satisfies the requirements described in Section 1941 and 1941.1 before it is made available for hire.(b) (1) If a landlord has an inspection performed pursuant to subdivision (a), the landlord shall be provided an inspection report that contains documentation of each violation of Section 1941, if any, and of each action that is required to be taken to remedy the violation.(2) If a landlord has an inspection performed pursuant to subdivision (a) showing no violation of Section 1941, it shall be presumed that the dwelling unit satisfies the requirement described in Section 1941 for a period of _____ years.(c) If, during the period descried in subdivision (b), a tenant makes the landlord aware of a dilapidation of the premises, the landlord shall have a period of _____ days in which to cure or correct the dilapidation and the landlord shall not be deemed to be in violation of Section 1941 during that period.(d) (1) An inspection performed at the request of a landlord pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be performed by a state or local enforcement agency that is responsible for the enforcement of any housing law or to respond to a complaint from a tenant, resident, or occupant, or an agent of a tenant, resident, or occupant, pursuant to Section 17970.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) If the inspection is performed by a local agency, the agency may charge the landlord a fee sufficient to cover its cost in providing the inspection.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 1941.2 of the Civil Code is amended to read:1941.2.(a) No duty on the part of the landlord to repair a dilapidation shall arise pursuant to Section 1941 or 1942 if the tenant is in substantial violation of any of the following affirmative obligations, provided that the tenant’s violation contributes substantially to the existence of the dilapidation or interferes substantially with the landlord’s obligation pursuant to Section 1941 to make the necessary repairs:(1)To keep that part of the premises that they occupy and use clean and sanitary as the condition of the premises permits.(2)To dispose from their dwelling unit of all rubbish, garbage and other waste, in a clean and sanitary manner.(3)To properly use and operate all electrical, gas, and plumbing fixtures and keep them as clean and sanitary as their condition permits.(4)Not to permit any person on the premises, with their permission, to willfully or wantonly destroy, deface, damage, impair or remove any part of the structure or dwelling unit or the facilities, equipment, or appurtenances thereto, nor themselves do any such thing.(5)To occupy the premises as their abode, utilizing portions thereof for living, sleeping, cooking or dining purposes that were respectively designed or intended to be used for those occupancies.(b)Paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) shall not apply if the landlord has expressly agreed in writing to perform the act or acts mentioned therein.